District of Columbia statutes.
48-904.06

Distribution to minors.

(a)

Any person who is 21 years of age or over and who violates § 48-904.01(a) by distributing a controlled substance which is listed in Schedule I or II and which is a narcotic drug, phencyclidine, or a phencyclidine immediate precursor to a person who is under 18 years of age may be punished by the fine authorized by § 48-904.01(a)(2)(A), by a term of imprisonment of up to twice that authorized by § 48-904.01(a)(2)(A), or by both.

(b)

Any person who is 21 years of age or over and who violates § 48-904.01(a) by distributing for remuneration any other controlled substance which is listed in Schedule I, II, III, IV, or V, except for phencyclidine or a phencyclidine immediate precursor, to a person who is under 18 years of age may be punished by the fine authorized by § 48-904.01(a)(2)(B), (C), or (D), respectively, by a term of imprisonment up to twice that authorized by § 48-904.01(a)(2)(B), (C), or (D), respectively, or both.

Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-29, § 406, 28 DCR 3081
Mar. 15, 1985, D.C. Law 5-171, § 2(b), 32 DCR 730

History

This section is referenced in § 48-904.08.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 33-546.

Prior Codifications